Maryland, session 2025, SB0956.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Insurance
15–922.1.
(A) THIS SECTION APPLIES TO A MEDICARE SUPPLEMENT POLICY ISSUED:
(1) UNDER § 15–909(B)(6) OF THIS SUBTITLE; OR
(2) TO AN INDIVIDUAL AT LEAST 65 YEARS OLD.
(B) A CARRIER SHALL PAY THE SAME COMMISSION RATE RATES TO A
BROKER AN INSURANCE PRODUCER FOR THE SALE OF A MEDICARE SUPPLEMENT
POLICY WITHOUT REGARD TO WHETHER THE POLICY IS SOLD DURING A
GUARANTEED ISSUE PERIOD AS A MEDICARE SUPPLEMENT POLICY SOLD DURING
AN OPEN ENROLLMENT PERIOD, AS AN UNDERWRITTEN POLICY, OR UNDER §
15–909(B)(6) OF THIS SUBTITLE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 20, 2025.
– 1 –